Wisconsin, session 2025, SB253.
do enact as follows:SB253,11Section 1. 1.03 (4) of the statutes is created to read:SB253,2,521.03 (4) That the state shall forever retain concurrent jurisdiction over any 3matter involving a juvenile 10 years of age or older who is alleged to be delinquent 4under s. 938.12 (1), or a juvenile alleged to be in need of protection or services under 5s. 938.13.SB253,26Section 2. 1.031 of the statutes is renumbered 1.031 (1).SB253,37Section 3. 1.031 (2) of the statutes is created to read:SB253,2,1581.031 (2) The governor shall accept on behalf of the state, retrocession of full 9or partial jurisdiction over any juvenile 10 years of age or older who is alleged to be 10delinquent under s. 938.12 (1) or juvenile alleged to be in need of protection or 11services under s. 938.13 due to acts committed by a juvenile within federal enclaves 12within the state where such retrocession has been offered by appropriate federal 13authority. Documents concerning such action shall be filed in the office of the 14secretary of state and recorded in the office of the register of deeds of the county 15wherein such lands are located.SB253,416Section 4. 938.12 (1) of the statutes is amended to read:SB253,2,1917938.12 (1) In general. The court has exclusive jurisdiction, except as 18provided in ss. 1.03 (4), 938.17, 938.18, and 938.183, over any juvenile 10 years of 19age or older who is alleged to be delinquent.SB253,520Section 5. 938.13 (intro.) of the statutes is amended to read:SB253,3,321938.13 Jurisdiction over juveniles alleged to be in need of protection 22or services. (intro.) Except as provided in s. ss. 1.03 (4) and 938.028 (3), the court 1has exclusive original jurisdiction over a juvenile alleged to be in need of protection 2or services which can be ordered by the court if any of the following conditions 3applies:SB253,3,44